West Virginia, session 2025, HB2113.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 11. GENERAL PROVISIONS CONCERNING CRIMES. §61-11-6. Punishment of principals in the second degree and accessories before and after the fact. (a) In the case of every felony, every principal in the second degree and every accessory before the fact shall be punishable as if he or she were the principal in the first degree; and every accessory after the fact is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be confined in jail not more than one year and fined not exceeding $500: But Provided, That no person in the relation of husband and wife, parent or grandparent, child or grandchild, brother or sister, by consanguinity or affinity, or servant spouse or domestic partner to the offender, who, after the commission of a felony, shall aid or assist aids or assists a principal felon, or accessory before the fact, to avoid or escape from prosecution or punishment shall may be deemed considered an accessory after the fact.(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, any person who knowingly harbors, conceals, maintains or assists the principal felon after the commission of the underlying offense violating the felony provisions of §61-2-1, §61-2-4,or §61-2-9 of this code, or gives such offender aid knowing that he or she has committed such felony, with the intent that the offender avoid or escape detention, arrest, trial or punishment, shall be considered an accessory after the fact and is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be guilty of a felony and, confined imprisoned in a state correctional facility for a period not to exceed five years, or a period of not more than one half of the maximum penalty for the underlying felony offense, whichever is the lesser maximum term of confinement: But Provided, That no person who is a person in the relation of husband and wife, parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, brother or sister, whether by consanguinity or affinity, or servant spouse or domestic partner to the offender shall may be considered an accessory after the fact.(c) An accessory to a felony who is the brother or sister, parent or grandparent, or child or grandchild of the principal offender and who is an accessory to a felony pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. (d) An accessory to a misdemeanor is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be indicted, tried, and convicted in the manner provided for an accessory to a felony and, upon conviction thereof, except where a different punishment is otherwise specially provided by the law, shall be confined in jail for not more than 30 days, or fined not more than $500, or both fined and confined.